Massachusetts, session 194th, H1364.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 131 and 226 of chapter 139 of the acts of 2012 are hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2: Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:-
Section 31. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Cost-sharing”, as defined in subsection (a) of section 21C of chapter 94C.
“Estimated rebate”, any: (i) negotiated price concessions, whether described as a rebate
or otherwise, including, but not limited to, base price concessions, and reasonable estimates of
any price protection rebates and performance-based price concessions that may accrue, directly
or indirectly, to a carrier, pharmacy benefit manager or other party on a carrier’s behalf during a
of 5

carrier’s plan year from a pharmaceutical manufacturing company, dispensing pharmacy or other
party to the transaction based on the amounts the carrier received in the prior quarter or
reasonably expects to receive in the current quarter; and (ii) reasonable estimates of any price
concessions, fees and other administrative costs that are passed through, or are reasonably
anticipated to be passed through to the carrier, pharmacy benefit manager or other party on the
carrier’s behalf and that serve to reduce the carrier’s prescription drug liabilities for the plan year
based on the amounts the carrier received in the prior quarter or reasonably expects to receive in
the current quarter.
“Pharmacy benefit manager”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 176Y.
“Price protection rebate”, a negotiated price concession that accrues directly or indirectly
to the carrier, or other party on behalf of the carrier, including a pharmacy benefit manager, in
the event of an increase in the wholesale acquisition cost of a drug that is greater than a specified
threshold.
(b) A carrier, or any pharmacy benefit manager, shall make available to an insured at
least 80 per cent of the estimated rebates received by such carrier, or any pharmacy benefit
manager, by reducing the amount of defined cost-sharing that the carrier would otherwise charge
at the point of sale, except that the reduction amount shall not result in a credit at the point of
sale. Neither the insured nor the carrier shall be responsible for any difference between the
estimated rebate amount and the actual rebate amount the carrier receives; provided, that such
estimates were calculated in good faith.
(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude a pharmacy benefit manager from decreasing an
insured’s defined cost-sharing by an amount greater than that required under subsection (b).
of 5

(d) Annually, not later than April 1, a carrier shall file with the division a report in the
manner and form determined by the commissioner demonstrating the manner in which the carrier
has complied with this section. If the commissioner determines that a carrier has not complied
with 1 or more requirements of this section, the commissioner shall notify the carrier of such
noncompliance and a date by which the carrier must demonstrate compliance. If the carrier does
not come into compliance by such date, the division shall impose a fine not to exceed $5,000 for
each day during which such noncompliance continues.
(e) In implementing the requirements of this section, the division shall only regulate a
carrier or pharmacy benefit manager to the extent permissible under applicable law.
(f) A pharmacy benefit manager, its agent or any third-party administrator shall not
publish or otherwise disclose information regarding the actual amount of rebates a carrier
receives on a specific product or therapeutic class of products, manufacturer or pharmacy-
specific basis. Such information shall be considered to be a trade secret and confidential
commercial information, shall not be a public record as defined by clause Twenty-sixth of
section 7 of chapter 4 or section 10 of chapter 66, and shall not be disclosed directly or
indirectly, or in a manner that would allow for the identification of an individual product,
therapeutic class of products or manufacturer, or in a manner that would have the potential to
compromise the financial, competitive or proprietary nature of the information. A pharmacy
benefit manager shall impose the confidentiality protections and requirements of this section on
any agent or third-party administrator that performs health care or administrative services on
behalf of the pharmacy benefit manager that may receive or have access to rebate related
information.
of 5

SECTION 3. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the health
policy commission, together with the secretary of the executive office of health and human
services, shall conduct an analysis and issue a report on the future of cell and gene therapy in the
commonwealth with the objective of addressing anticipated barriers to access that may exist with
respect to such treatments for patients covered by MassHealth programs and other vulnerable
populations. The analysis and report shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) a projection of the estimated total number of cell and gene therapy products, including
information on the diseases and conditions such products will be approved to treat (including the
total estimated number of lives impacted in the commonwealth, and the total number receiving
care under MassHealth), that are expected to come to market in the U.S. (hereinafter the
“products”) during a forecast period of 2027 to 2037 (hereinafter, the “forecast period”);
(2) an assessment of existing reimbursement frameworks and methodologies employed
by MassHealth for the products to the extent purchased by health care facilities for
administration to MassHealth beneficiaries during inpatient hospital stays;
(3) an assessment of whether the reimbursement frameworks and methodologies
identified in subdivision (2) would lead to barriers to access to the products during the forecast
period in light of the projected costs to the Massachusetts health care system associated with the
utilization of the products, and whether such barriers to access, if any, would disproportionately
impact MassHealth beneficiaries or other vulnerable populations, including population groups
that may be more likely to have adverse health outcomes due to experience with historic
disparities or discrimination, including racial or ethnic minority population groups;
of 5

(4) An assessment of whether the health care facility infrastructure in place and planned
for development during the forecast period, and that is necessary of the administration of the
products, will be adequate to ensure equitable access for patients in need of treatment with the
products.
(b) To the extent that the analysis required under subdivision (3) of subsection (a)
identifies any barriers to access, the commission and the secretary shall analyze and report on the
reasons for such barriers and shall propose corrective policy solutions. If any identified barriers
are the result of or otherwise related to current MassHealth reimbursement methodologies for
gene and cell therapies, the commission and the secretary shall propose modifications to such
methodologies to the extent authorized under Federal law. Such proposed modifications shall
address and be designed to eliminate any disproportionate impact of the access barriers on
MassHealth beneficiaries or other vulnerable populations.
(c) In conducting the analysis and producing the report as required by subsection (a), the
secretary and the commission shall consult with the Massachusetts Biotechnology Council or a
designee, the Massachusetts Hospital Association or a designee, the Conference of Boston
Teaching Hospitals or a designee, and the rare disease advisory council established pursuant to
section 26 of chapter 260 of the acts of 2020.
(d) The report shall be made available electronically on the commission’s website, and
shall be filed with the secretary of administration and finance, the clerks of the house of
representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on health care financing no later than July 30, 2028.
of 5